Maine, session 132, LD1513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to direct the Governor's Energy Office, in consultation with the
Public Utilities Commission and the Office of the Public Advocate, to conduct an inquiry
that includes an evaluation of investment planning undertaken by gas utilities and
consideration of a framework for commission oversight of future investments made by gas
utilities and to establish a commission to study the establishment of a just and equitable
transition for Maine's workforce affected by state energy policies and goals.
Page 1 - 132LR1912(01)